Hawaii statutes.
§449-4 Administrative penalty. (a)
Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter, shall be subject
to an administrative fine of a maximum of $5,000 for each
violation. The commissioner may impose an administrative fine on a licensee or
person subject to this chapter if the commissioner finds on the record after
notice and opportunity for hearing that the licensee or person subject to this
chapter has violated or failed to comply with any requirement of this chapter
or any rule prescribed by the commissioner under this chapter or order issued
under the authority of this chapter.

(b) Each violation under this chapter or
failure to comply with any directive or order of the commissioner shall be a
separate and distinct violation.

(c) Notwithstanding section 480-13.5, any
violation of this chapter that is directed toward, targets, or injures an elder
may be subject to an additional civil penalty not in excess of $10,000 for each
violation in addition to any other fines or penalties assessed for the
violation.

(d) No licensee
shall be subject to this penalty for a violation of section 449-16(b) or (c) if
the violation was not intentional or resulted from a bona fide error,
notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid that
error. Examples of bona fide errors include, but are not limited to, clerical
miscalculations, computer malfunction, printing errors, and computer
programming errors. [L 1967, c 144, pt of §1; HRS §449-4; am L 1986, c
331, §2; am L 1992, c 205, §5; am L 2013, c 166, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next